Missouri, session 2026, SB1420.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 105.963, 143.611, and 209.030, RSMo,
are repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 105.963, 143.611, and 209.030, to read as
follows:
105.963. 1. The executive director shall assess every
committee, as defined in section 130.011, failing to file
with a filing officer other than a local election authority
as provided by section 130.026 a campaign disclosure report
as required by chapter 130, other than the report required
pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section
130.046, a late filing fee of ten dollars for each day after
such report is due to the commission. The executive
director shall [mail] send a notice[, by registered mail,]
to any candidate and the treasurer of any committee who
fails to file such report informing such person of such
failure and the fees provided by this section. If the
candidate or treasurer of any committee persists in such
failure for a period in excess of thirty days beyond receipt
of such notice, the amount of the late filing fee shall
increase to one hundred dollars for each day that the report
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1420 2
is not filed, provided that the total amount of such fees
assessed pursuant to this subsection per report shall not
exceed three thousand dollars.
2. (1) Any candidate for state or local office who
fails to file a campaign disclosure report required pursuant
to subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 130.046, other
than a report required to be filed with a local election
authority as provided by section 130.026, shall be assessed
by the executive director a late filing fee of one hundred
dollars for each day that the report is not filed, until the
first day after the date of the election. After such
election date, the amount of such late filing fee shall
accrue at the rate of ten dollars per day that such report
remains unfiled, except as provided in subdivision (2) of
this subsection.
(2) The executive director shall [mail] send a
notice[, by certified mail or other means to give actual
notice,] to any candidate who fails to file the report
described in subdivision (1) of this subsection informing
such person of such failure and the fees provided by this
section. If the candidate persists in such failure for a
period in excess of thirty days beyond receipt of such
notice, the amount of the late filing fee shall increase to
one hundred dollars for each day that the report is not
filed, provided that the total amount of such fees assessed
pursuant to this subsection per report shall not exceed six
thousand dollars.
3. The executive director shall assess every person
required to file a financial interest statement pursuant to
sections 105.483 to 105.492 failing to file such a financial
interest statement with the commission a late filing fee of
ten dollars for each day after such statement is due to the

SB 1420 3
commission. The executive director shall [mail] send a
notice[, by certified mail,] to any person who fails to file
such statement informing the individual required to file of
such failure and the fees provided by this section. If the
person persists in such failure for a period in excess of
thirty days beyond receipt of such notice, the amount of the
late filing fee shall increase to one hundred dollars for
each day thereafter that the statement is late, provided
that the total amount of such fees assessed pursuant to this
subsection per statement shall not exceed six thousand
dollars.
4. Any person assessed a late filing fee may seek
review of such assessment or the amount of late filing fees
assessed, at the person's option, by filing a petition
within fourteen days after receiving [actual] notice of
assessment with the administrative hearing commission, or
without exhausting the person's administrative remedies may
seek review of such issues with the circuit court of Cole
County.
5. The executive director of the Missouri ethics
commission shall collect such late filing fees as are
provided for in this section. Unpaid late filing fees shall
be collected by action filed by the commission. The
commission shall contract with the appropriate entity to
collect such late filing fees after a thirty-day
delinquency. If not collected within one hundred twenty
days, the Missouri ethics commission shall file a petition
in Cole County circuit court to seek a judgment on said
fees. All late filing fees collected pursuant to this
section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and
deposited to the general revenue fund.

SB 1420 4
6. The late filing fees provided by this section shall
be in addition to any penalty provided by law for violations
of sections 105.483 to 105.492 or chapter 130.
7. If any candidate fails to file a campaign
disclosure report in a timely manner and that candidate is
assessed a late filing fee, the candidate, candidate
committee treasurer or assistant treasurer may file an
appeal of the assessment of the late filing fee with the
commission. The commission may forgive the assessment of
the late filing fee upon a showing of good cause. Such
appeal shall be filed within ten days of the receipt of
notice of the assessment of the late filing fee.
143.611. 1. As soon as practical after the return is
filed, the director of revenue shall examine it to determine
the correct amount of tax. If the director of revenue finds
that the amount of tax shown on the return is less than the
correct amount, he shall notify the taxpayer of the amount
of the deficiency proposed to be assessed. If the director
of revenue finds that the tax paid is more than the correct
amount, he shall credit the overpayment against any taxes
due under sections 143.011 to 143.996 from the taxpayer and
refund the difference. No deficiency shall be proposed and
no refund shall be made pursuant to this or any section of
sections 143.011 to 143.996 unless the amount exceeds one
dollar.
2. If the taxpayer fails to file an income tax return,
the director of revenue shall estimate the taxpayer's
taxable income and the tax thereon from any available
information and notify the taxpayer of the amount proposed
to be assessed as in the case of a deficiency.
3. The notice required by subsections 1 and 2 of this
section, hereafter referred to as a notice of deficiency,

SB 1420 5
shall set forth the reason for the proposed assessment. The
notice of deficiency shall be mailed by [certified or
registered] regular first class mail to the taxpayer at his
last known address or delivered electronically at the
taxpayer's request. In the case of a combined return, the
notice of deficiency may be a single combined notice except
that if the director of revenue is notified by either spouse
that separate residences have been established he shall mail
notices to each spouse. If the taxpayer is deceased, is
under a legal disability, or, in the case of a corporation,
has terminated its existence, a notice of deficiency may be
mailed to his last known address unless the director of
revenue has received notice of the existence and address of
a person to receive notices with respect to such taxpayer.
209.030. 1. Every adult blind person, eighteen years
of age or over, of good moral character who shall have been
a resident of the state of Missouri for one year or more
next preceding the time of making application for the
pension herein provided and every adult blind person
eighteen years of age or over who may have lost his or her
sight while a bona fide resident of this state and who has
been a continuous resident thereof since such loss of sight,
shall be entitled to receive, when enrolled under the
provisions of sections 209.010 to 209.160, an annual pension
as provided for herein, payable in equal monthly
installments, provided, that no such person shall be
entitled to or be paid a blind pension who:
(1) Owns property or has an interest in property to
the value of thirty thousand dollars or more, or if married
and actually living with husband or wife, if the value of
his or her interest in property, together with that of such
husband or wife, exceeds said amount; provided that, the

SB 1420 6
first one hundred thousand dollars in an individual's ABLE
account under sections 209.600 to 209.645 shall be excluded
from such asset limit; provided, further, that in
determining the total value of property owned, the real
estate occupied by the blind person or spouse as the home,
shall be excluded;
(2) Obtains, maintains, or renews a valid driver's
license in this or any other state or territory, unless such
license has been relinquished to the department of revenue
and the person provides satisfactory proof of such
relinquishment to the department of social services. The
department of social services shall notify eligible blind
persons with valid driver's licenses that they shall
surrender such licenses within sixty days of approval for a
blind pension. Upon receipt of a relinquished license under
this subdivision, the department of revenue shall, if
requested by the person, issue a nondriver's license card
compliant with the provisions of chapter 302 at no charge to
the person. The department of social services and the
department of revenue shall jointly establish procedures and
shall share any information necessary to implement this
subdivision;
(3) Operates a motor vehicle with or without a valid
driver's license;
(4) Has a sighted spouse resident in this state who
upon the investigation of the family support division may be
found to be able to provide for the reasonable support of
such applicant if the sighted spouse's annual income is
equal to or greater than five hundred percent of the federal
poverty level for each state fiscal year;
(5) Publicly solicits alms in any manner or through
any artifice in any part of this state;

SB 1420 7
(6) Is maintained in a private or endowed institution
or is an inmate of a public institution, except as a patient
in a public medical institution; provided, that benefits
shall not be paid to a blind person under sixty-five years
of age, who is a patient in an institution for mental
diseases or tuberculosis. In order to comply with federal
laws and regulations and state plans in making payments to
or on behalf of mentally ill individuals sixty-five years of
age, or over, who are patients in a state mental
institution, the family support division shall require
agreements or other arrangements with the institution to
provide a framework for cooperation and to assure that state
plan requirements and federal laws and regulations relating
to such payment will be observed. In the event the federal
laws or regulations will not permit approval of the state
plan for benefit payments to or on behalf of an individual
who is sixty-five years of age, or over, and is a patient in
a state institution for mental diseases, this portion of
this subdivision shall be inoperative until approval of a
state plan is obtained;
(7) Is otherwise not blind and not eligible for a
blind pension under this chapter; or
(8) Pleads guilty or has been found to have violated
section 209.140.
2. Any applicant for or any recipient of a blind
pension who does not submit, without good cause or as
otherwise specified by the department of social services, to
a vision test as required under section 209.040 within
thirty days of a request by the department shall not be
eligible for a blind pension and the department shall
terminate payment after notice and an opportunity for a
hearing.

SB 1420 8
3. The applicant for or recipient of a blind pension
shall inform the department of any change of address or
other contact information and any other change of
circumstances that may impact the applicant or recipient's
eligibility for a blind pension within ten days of the
change. Any notice served on the applicant or recipient
shall be sent by [certified] mail delivered by the United
States Postal Service at the applicant's or recipient's
address of record and shall be deemed service for all
purposes under sections 209.010 to 209.160, except that for
any notice of adverse actions being taken against the
applicant or recipient to be deemed service for all purposes
under sections 209.010 to 209.160, such notice shall also be
sent by certified mail delivered by the United States Postal
Service at the applicant's or recipient's address of
record. Adverse actions shall include, but are not limited
to, setting a hearing date, terminating payments, and other
100 significant actions the department can take against the
101 applicant or recipient under sections 209.010 to 209.160.
✓